Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2103.02
Acquisition of housing property; relocation of persons displaced.

When any property consisting of housing is acquired for redevelopment by the authority, the authority shall provide for relocation of any persons displaced as a result thereof.

Laws 1965, c. 74, § 5, p. 306.